Vermont, session 2025-2026, H717.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Residential and Commercial Building Energy Standards * * *
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 2 of 35
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 173, subchapter 2 is amended to read:
Subchapter 2. Division of Fire and Building Safety
§ 2728. DIRECTOR OF FIRE SAFETY
There shall be a Director of Fire and Building Safety, who shall be
responsible for the operation and supervision of the Fire and Building Safety
Division of the Department of Public Safety. The Director shall report directly
to the Commissioner and shall serve as a member of the Fire Service Training
Council. The Director shall be an exempt State employee and shall be
appointed by the Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor.
* * *
§ 2731. RULES; INSPECTIONS; VARIANCES
* * *
(l) Energy standard certificates. Provision of a certificate as required by
30 V.S.A. § 51 section 2772 of this title (residential building energy standards)
or 53 section 2774 of this title (commercial building energy standards) shall be
a condition precedent to the issuance of a certificate of use or occupancy for a
public building under the rules adopted pursuant to this section.
* * *
§ 2734. PENALTIES
(a) A person who violates any provision of this subchapter or subchapter
2B of this chapter or any order or rule issued pursuant to this subchapter shall
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 3 of 35
be fined not more than $10,000.00. The State’s Attorney of the county in
which the violation occurs shall prosecute the violation and may commence a
proceeding in the Superior Court to compel compliance with the order or rule,
and the court may make orders and decrees in relation to the proceeding by
way of writ of injunction or otherwise.
* * *
(c) The Commissioner may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, assess
an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation of this
subchapter or subchapter 2B of this chapter or any rule adopted under this
subchapter. Penalties assessed pursuant to this subsection shall be based on the
severity of the violation. An election by the Commissioner to proceed under
this subsection shall not limit or restrict the Commissioner’s authority under
subsection (a) of this section.
(d) Violation of any rule adopted under this subchapter or subchapter 2B of
this chapter shall be prima facie evidence of negligence in any civil action for
damage or injury that is the result of the violation.
* * *
§ 2736. MUNICIPAL ENFORCEMENT
(a)(1) The legislative body of a municipality may appoint one or more
trained and qualified officials and may establish procedures to enforce rules
and standards adopted under subsection 2731(a) of this title and sections 2772
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 4 of 35
(residential building energy standards) and 2774 (commercial building energy
standards) of this title.
(2) After considering the type of buildings within the municipality, if the
Commissioner determines that the training, qualifications, and procedures are
sufficient, he or she the Commissioner may assign responsibility to the
municipality for enforcement of some or all of these the rules and standards
adopted under subsection 2731(a) of this title and sections 2772 (residential
building energy standards) and 2774 (commercial building energy standards)
of this title. The Commissioner may also assign responsibility for enforcement
of the rules of the Access Board adopted under section 2902 of this title.
(3) The Commissioner shall provide continuing review, consultation,
and assistance as may be necessary.
(4) The assignment of responsibility may be revoked by the
Commissioner after notice and an opportunity for hearing if the Commissioner
determines that the training, qualifications, or procedures are insufficient.
(5) The assignment of responsibility shall not affect the Commissioner’s
authority under this subchapter.
* * *
Sec. 2. REPEAL
30 V.S.A. chapter 2, subchapter 1 (building energy standards) is repealed.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 5 of 35
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. chapter 173, subchapter 2B is added to read:
Subchapter 2B. Building Energy Standards
§ 2771. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Builder” means the general contractor or other person in charge of
construction, who has the power to direct others with respect to the details to
be observed in construction.
(2) “CBES” means the Commercial Building Energy Standards adopted
pursuant to section 2774 of this subchapter.
(3) “Commercial buildings” means all buildings that are not residential
buildings as defined in subdivision (6) of this section or farm structures as
defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4413. With respect to a structure that is a mixed-use
building that shares residential and commercial users:
(A) if the structure is three stories or fewer in height, the term
“commercial building” includes all commercial uses within the structure and
all common areas and facilities that serve both residential and commercial
uses; and
(B) if the structure is four stories or more in height, the term
“commercial building” includes all uses and areas within the structure.
(4) “Director” means the Director of the Division of Fire and Building
Safety.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 6 of 35
(5) “IECC” means the International Energy Conservation Code of the
International Code Council.
(6) “Residential buildings” means two-family dwellings and multi-
family housing three stories or fewer in height.
(A) With respect to a structure that is three stories or fewer in height
and is a mixed-use building that shares residential and commercial users, the
term “residential building” includes the living spaces in the structure and the
nonliving spaces in the structure that serve only the residential users such as
common hallways, laundry facilities, residential management offices,
community rooms, storage rooms, and foyers.
(B) “Residential buildings” does not include hunting camps.
(7) “Residential construction” means new construction of residential
buildings, and the construction of additions, alterations, renovations, or repairs
to an existing residential building.
(8) “Stretch code” means a building energy code for residential
buildings that achieves greater energy savings than the RBES and is adopted in
accordance with subsection 2772(c) of this section.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 7 of 35
§ 2772. RESIDENTIAL BUILDING ENERGY STANDARDS; STRETCH
CODE
(a) Adoption of Residential Building Energy Standards (RBES). The
Director shall adopt RBES as provided pursuant to this section, and residential
construction shall be in compliance with the RBES adopted by the Director.
(b) Revision and interpretation of RBES. The Director shall amend and
update the RBES by means of administrative rules adopted in accordance with
3 V.S.A. chapter 25. The Director shall endeavor to update and revise the
RBES promptly after the issuance of updated standards for residential
construction under the IECC. The Department of Public Service shall provide
technical assistance and expert advice to the Director in the interpretation of
the RBES and in the formulation of specific proposals for amending the RBES.
Prior to final adoption of each required revision of the RBES, the Director
shall convene an advisory committee to include one or more mortgage lenders;
builders; building designers; individuals with expertise in building science;
utility representatives; architects; civil, mechanical, and electrical engineers;
environmental organizations; consumer advocates; energy efficiency experts;
the Attorney General or designee; and other persons with experience and
expertise that the Director and Commissioner deem to be appropriate, such as
consumer advocates and energy conservation experts. The advisory committee
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 8 of 35
may provide the Director with additional recommendations for the revision of
the RBES.
(1) Any amendments to the RBES shall be:
(A) consistent with duly adopted State energy policy, as specified in
30 V.S.A. § 202a, and consistent with duly adopted State housing policy;
(B) evaluated relative to their technical applicability and reliability;
and
(C) cost-effective and affordable from the consumer’s perspective.
(2) Each time the RBES are amended by the Director, the amended
RBES shall become effective upon a date specified in the adopted rule, which
shall not be less than three months after the date of adoption. Persons
commencing residential construction before the effective date of the amended
RBES shall have the option of complying with the applicable provisions of the
earlier or the amended RBES. After the effective date of the original or the
amended RBES, any person commencing residential construction shall comply
with the most recent version of the RBES.
(3) The RBES shall include standards for:
(A) ventilation;
(B) sealed combustion or induced or forced draft combustion
equipment when exhaust-only ventilation systems are installed; and
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 9 of 35
(C) adequate replacement air ducted directly to the combustion area
of wood and pellet stoves and fireplaces.
(4)(A)(i) The Division of Fire and Building Safety, in consultation with
the Department of Public Service, shall develop and disseminate criteria that
builders may use in lieu of any computer software, calculations and trade-off
worksheets, or systems analysis to comply with the Code. An example
package that complies with the Code shall be included in the rules and updated
as appropriate.
(ii) The Division of Fire and Building Safety, in consultation with
the Department of Public Service, may, as determined to be appropriate by the
Director of Fire and Building Safety, develop and disseminate information and
guidance regarding compliance with the performance and Energy Rating Index
approaches to compliance with the IECC.
(B) To provide for flexibility, additional packages that are equivalent
to the example package developed pursuant to subdivision (4)(A)(i) of this
subsection (b) and that satisfy the performance approach shall be developed
and disseminated by the Division of Fire and Building Safety in consultation
with Department of Public Service. Each time the RBES are amended by the
Director, the Division of Fire and Building Safety shall, in consultation with
the Department of Public Service, develop modified compliance packages that
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 10 of 35
will become available to the public by the date that the amendment becomes
effective.
(5) A home energy rating conducted at the time of construction by a
Vermont-accredited home energy rating organization shall be an acceptable
means of demonstrating compliance if the rating indicates energy performance
equivalent to the RBES.
(c) Stretch code. The Director may adopt a stretch code by rule. This
stretch code shall meet the requirements of subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
The stretch code shall be available for adoption by municipalities under
24 V.S.A. chapter 117 and, on final adoption by the Director, shall apply in
proceedings under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 (Act 250) in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Role of RBES and stretch code in Act 250. Substantial and reliable
evidence of compliance with the RBES and, when adopted, the stretch code
established and updated under this section shall serve as a presumption of
compliance with 10 V.S.A. § 6086(a)(9)(F), except no presumption shall be
created insofar as compliance with 10 V.S.A. § 6086(a)(9)(F) involves the role
of electric resistance space heating. In attempting to rebut a presumption of
compliance created under this subsection, a challenge may only focus on the
question of whether or not there will be compliance with the RBES and stretch
code established and updated under this section. A presumption under this
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 11 of 35
subsection shall not be overcome by evidence that the RBES and stretch code
adopted and updated under this section fail to comply with 10 V.S.A.
§ 6086(a)(9)(F).
(e) Certification.
(1) Issuance; recording.
(A)(i) A certification may be issued by a builder, a licensed
professional engineer, a licensed architect, or an accredited home energy rating
organization.
(ii) The Director shall develop and make available to the public a
certificate that lists key features of the RBES. Any person certifying shall use
this certificate or one substantially like it to certify compliance with the RBES.
(iii) Certification shall be issued by completing and signing a
certificate and permanently affixing it to the outside of the heating or cooling
equipment, to the electrical service panel located inside the building, or in a
visible location in the vicinity of one of these three areas.
(iv) The certificate shall certify that residential construction meets
the RBES.
(v) The person certifying under this subsection (e) shall provide a
copy of each certificate to the Division of Fire and Building Safety.
(B) A builder may contract with a licensed professional engineer, a
licensed architect, or an accredited home energy rating organization to issue
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 12 of 35
certification and to indemnify the builder from any liability to the owner of the
residential construction caused by noncompliance with the RBES.
(2) Condition precedent. Provision of a certificate as required by
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be a condition precedent to:
(A) issuance by the Division of Fire and Building Safety or a
municipal official acting under section 2736 of this chapter of any final
occupancy permit required by the rules of the Commissioner of Public Safety
for use or occupancy of residential construction; and
(B) issuance by a municipality of a certificate of occupancy if the
municipality requires such a certificate under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117.
(f) Action for damages.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person aggrieved
by noncompliance with this section may bring a civil action against a person
that has the obligation of certifying compliance under subsection (e) of this
section. This action may seek injunctive relief, damages, court costs, and
attorney’s fees. As used in this subdivision, “damages” means:
(A) costs incidental to increased energy consumption; and
(B) labor, materials, and other expenses associated with bringing the
structure into compliance with the RBES in effect on the date construction was
commenced.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 13 of 35
(2) A person’s failure to affix the certification as required by this section
shall not be an affirmative defense in such an action against the person.
(3) The rights and remedies created by this section shall not be
construed to limit any rights and remedies otherwise provided by law.
(g) Applicability and exemptions. The construction of a residential
addition to a building shall not create a requirement that the entire building
comply with this subchapter. The following residential construction shall not
be subject to the requirements of this subchapter:
(1) buildings or additions whose peak energy use design rate for all
purposes is less than 3.4 BTUs per hour, per square foot, or less than one watt
per square foot of floor area;
(2) homes subject to Title VI of the National Manufactured Housing
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. §§ 5401–5426);
(3) buildings or additions that are neither heated nor cooled; and
(4) residential construction by an owner, if all of the following apply:
(A) The owner of the residential construction is the builder, as
defined under this section.
(B) The residential construction is used as a dwelling by the owner.
(C) The owner in fact directs the details of construction with regard
to the installation of materials not in compliance with the RBES.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 14 of 35
(D) The owner discloses in writing to a prospective buyer, before
entering into a binding purchase and sales agreement, the nature and extent of
any noncompliance with the RBES. Any statement or certificate given to a
prospective buyer shall itemize how the home does not comply with the RBES
and shall itemize which measures do not meet the RBES in effect at the time
construction commenced. Any certificate given under this subsection (g) shall
be sent to the Division of Fire and Building Safety within 30 days following
sale of the property by the owner.
(h) Title validity not affected. A defect in marketable title shall not be
created by a failure to issue certification or a certificate, as required under
subsection (e) or subdivision (g)(4) of this section, by a failure under either
subsection to affix or provide a certificate, or by a failure to provide a copy of
a certificate to the Division of Fire and Building Safety.
§ 2773. HOME ENERGY RATING ORGANIZATION ACCREDITATION
(a) The Department of Public Service shall carry out an accreditation
process for home energy rating organizations, in consultation with the Division
of Fire and Building Safety and representatives of interested parties, including
builders, building designers, building science experts, mortgage lenders, real
estate licensees, home appraisers, utilities, nonutility fuel suppliers, the
Vermont Housing Finance Agency, and contractors who provide home energy
rating services. As part of the accreditation process, the Department of Public
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 15 of 35
Service shall consider any national home energy rating system guidelines and
shall determine whether each provider of home energy ratings in the State of
Vermont complies with the accreditation criteria adopted pursuant to this
section.
(b) Once the Department of Public Service carries out an accreditation
process pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, no organization shall provide
home energy rating services in the State unless the organization has been
accredited by the Department.
(c) The Department shall consult with the organizations described in
subsection (a) of this section to facilitate a public information program to
inform homeowners, renters, sellers, and others regarding the accreditation
process and of the statewide home energy rating organizations accredited by
the Department.
§ 2774. COMMERCIAL BUILDING ENERGY STANDARDS
(a) Adoption of Commercial Building Energy Standards (CBES). The
Director shall adopt Commercial Building Energy Standards to ensure that
commercial building construction is designed and constructed in a manner that
complies with the most recent edition of ANSI/ASHRAE/IESNA standard
90.1 or of the IECC, whichever provides the greatest level of energy savings,
that is in effect on the date the CBES are adopted.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 16 of 35
(b) Revision and interpretation of energy standards. The Director shall
endeavor to amend and update the CBES by means of administrative rules
adopted in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 promptly after the issuance of
updated standards for commercial construction under the IECC or ANSI/
ASHRAE/IESNA standard 90.1, whichever provides the greatest level of
energy savings. Prior to final adoption of each required revision of the CBES,
the Director shall convene an advisory committee to include the Commissioner
of Public Service or designee; one or more mortgage lenders; builders;
building designers; individuals with expertise in building science; utility
representatives; architects; civil, mechanical, and electrical engineers;
environmental organizations; consumer advocates; energy efficiency experts;
the Attorney General or designee; and other persons with experience and
expertise that the Director and Commissioner deem to be appropriate, such as
consumer advocates and energy conservation experts. The advisory committee
may provide the Director with additional recommendations for the revision of
the CBES, including the frequency of the updates.
(1) Any amendments to the CBES shall be:
(A) consistent with duly adopted State energy policy, as specified in
30 V.S.A. § 202a; and
(B) evaluated relative to their technical applicability and reliability.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 17 of 35
(2) Each time the CBES are amended by the Director, the amended
CBES shall become effective upon a date specified in the adopted rule, which
shall not be less than three months after the date of adoption. Persons
submitting an application for any local permit authorizing commercial
construction or an application for construction plan approval by the Division of
Fire and Building Safety pursuant to this chapter before the effective date of
the amended CBES shall have the option of complying with the applicable
provisions of the earlier or the amended CBES. After the effective date of the
amended CBES, any person submitting an application for commercial
construction in an area subject to the CBES shall comply with the most recent
version of the CBES.
(3) The Director may adopt rules interpreting and implementing the
CBES.
(4) The Director may grant written variances or exemptions from the
CBES or rules adopted under this section where strict compliance would entail
practical difficulty or unnecessary hardship, or is otherwise found unwarranted,
provided that:
(A) any such variance or exemption shall be consistent with State
energy policy, as specified in 30 V.S.A. § 202a;
(B) any petitioner for such a variance or exemption can demonstrate
that the methods, means, or practices proposed to be taken in lieu of
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 18 of 35
compliance with the rule or rules provide, in the opinion of the Director, equal
energy efficiency to that attained by compliance with the rule or rules;
(C) a copy of any such variance or exemption shall be recorded by
the petitioner in the land records of the city or town in which the building is
located; and
(D) a record of each variance or exemption shall be maintained by
the Director, together with the certifications received by the Director.
(c) Requirement for compliance. Commercial building construction with
respect to which any local building permit application or application for
construction plan approval by the Division of Fire and Building Safety
pursuant to this chapter has been submitted shall be designed and constructed
in substantial compliance with the CBES adopted by the Director pursuant to
this section.
(d) Certification requirement.
(1)(A) The design of commercial buildings shall be certified by the
primary designer as compliant with the CBES in accordance with this
subsection (d), except as compliance is excused by a variance or exemption
issued under subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
(B)(i) If applicable law requires that the primary designer be a
licensed professional engineer, licensed architect, or other licensed
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 19 of 35
professional, a member of a pertinent licensed profession shall issue this
certification.
(ii) If one or more licensed professional engineers or licensed
architects is involved in the design of the project, one of these licensees shall
issue this certificate.
(iii) If a licensed professional engineer or a licensed architect is
not involved in designing the project, the design shall be reviewed and certified
by a licensed professional engineer or a licensed architect.
(C) Any certification shall be accompanied by an affidavit and shall
certify that the commercial building was designed in substantial compliance
with the requirements of the CBES and that, if applicable, the designer acted in
accordance with the designer’s professional duty of care in designing the
building.
(D) The Director shall develop and make available to the public a
certificate that lists key requirements of the CBES, sets forth certifying
language in accordance with this subdivision (1), and requires disclosure of
persons relied upon by the primary designer who have contracted to indemnify
the primary designer for damages arising out of that reliance. Any person
certifying under this subdivision (1) shall use this certificate or one
substantially like it to satisfy these certification obligations.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 20 of 35
(E) Certification shall be issued by completing and signing a
certificate and permanently affixing it to the outside of the heating or cooling
equipment, to the electrical service panel located inside the building, or in a
visible location in the vicinity of one of these three areas.
(i) In certifying under this subsection (d), the certifying person
may reasonably rely on one or more supporting affidavits received from other
persons who contributed to the design affirming that the portions of the design
produced by them were properly certifiable under this subsection (d).
(ii) The certifying person may contract for indemnification from
those on which the person relies pursuant to this subdivision (1) against
damages arising out of that reliance. This indemnification shall not limit any
rights of action of an aggrieved party.
(2)(A) The construction of a commercial building shall be certified as
compliant with the CBES in accordance with this subsection (d), except as
compliance is excused by a variance or exemption issued under subdivision
(b)(4) of this section.
(B) This certification shall be issued by the general contractor,
construction manager, or other party having primary responsibility for
coordinating the construction of the subject building, or in the absence of such
a person, by an accredited energy rating organization approved by the Director.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 21 of 35
(C) Any certification shall be accompanied by an affidavit and shall
certify that the subject commercial building was constructed in accordance
with the ordinary standard of care applicable to the participating construction
trades and that the subject commercial building was constructed substantially
in accordance with the construction documents, including the plans and
specifications certified under subdivision (1) of this subsection (d) for that
building.
(D) The Director shall develop and make available to the public a
certificate that sets forth certifying language in accordance with this
subdivision (2) and that requires disclosure of persons who have been relied
upon by the person with primary responsibility for coordinating the
construction of the building and who have contracted to indemnify that person
for damages arising out of that reliance. The person certifying under this
subdivision (2) shall use that certificate or one substantially like it to satisfy
these certification obligations.
(E) Certification shall be issued by completing and signing a
certificate and permanently affixing it to the outside of the heating or cooling
equipment, to the electrical service panel located inside the building, or in a
visible location in the vicinity of one of these three areas.
(F)(i) In certifying under this subdivision (2), the certifying person
may reasonably rely on one or more supporting affidavits received from
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 22 of 35
subcontractors or others engaged in the construction of the subject commercial
building affirming that the portions of the building constructed by them were
properly certifiable under this subdivision (2).
(ii) The certifying person may contract for indemnification from
those on which the person relies pursuant to this subdivision (2) against
damages arising out of that reliance. This indemnification shall not limit any
rights of action of an aggrieved party.
(3) Any person certifying under this subsection shall provide a copy of
the person’s certificate and any accompanying affidavit to the Department of
Public Service.
(4) Provision of a certificate as required by subdivision (1) of this
subsection and of a certificate as required by subdivision (2) of this subsection
shall be conditions precedent to:
(A) issuance by the Division of Fire and Building Safety, or a
municipal official acting under section 2736 of this chapter, of any final
occupancy permit required by the rules of the Commissioner of Public Safety
for use or occupancy of a commercial building that is also a public building;
and
(B) issuance by a municipality of a certificate of occupancy for
commercial construction if the municipality requires such a certificate under
24 V.S.A. chapter 117.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 23 of 35
(e) Exemptions.
(1) The following commercial buildings, or portions of those buildings,
separated from the remainder of the building by thermal envelope assemblies
complying with this section shall be exempt from the building thermal
envelope provisions of the CBES:
(A) those that do not contain conditioned space; and
(B) those with a peak design rate of energy usage less than an amount
specified in the CBES adopted under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The CBES adopted pursuant to this section shall not apply to
equipment or portions of building energy systems that use energy primarily to
provide for industrial or manufacturing processes.
(f) Private right of action for damages against a certifier.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person aggrieved
by another person’s breach of the representations contained in a certification or
supporting affidavit issued or received as provided under subsection (d) of this
section, within 10 years after the earlier of completion of construction or
occupancy of the affected commercial building or portion of that building, may
bring a civil action in Superior Court against a person who has an obligation of
certifying compliance under subsection (d) of this section alleging breach of
the representations contained in that person’s certification. This action may
seek injunctive relief, damages arising from the aggrieved party’s reliance on
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 24 of 35
the accuracy of those representations, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s
fees in an amount to be determined by the court. For purposes of this
subdivision, “damages” includes costs incidental to increased energy
consumption.
(2) A person’s failure to affix the certification as required by this section
shall not be an affirmative defense in such an action against the person.
(3) The rights and remedies created by this section shall not be
construed to limit any rights and remedies otherwise provided by law.
(4) The right of action established in this subsection shall not be waived
by contract or other agreement.
(5) It shall be a defense to an action under this subsection that either at
the time of completion or at any time thereafter, the commercial building or
portion of building covered by a certificate under subsection (d) of this section,
as actually constructed, met or exceeded the overall performance standards
established in the CBES in effect on the date construction was commenced.
(g) State or local enforcement. Any person who knowingly makes a false
certification under subsection (d) of this section, or any party who fails to
certify under subsection (d) of this section when required to do so, shall be
subject to a civil penalty of not more than $250.00 per day, up to $10,000.00
for each year the violation continues.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 25 of 35
(h) Title validity not affected. A defect in marketable title shall not be
created by a failure to record a variance or exemption pursuant to subdivision
(b)(4) of this section, by a failure to issue certification or a certificate, as
required under subsection (d) of this section, or by a failure under that
subsection to affix a certificate or provide a copy of a certificate to the
Department of Public Service.
§ 2775. COMPLIANCE PLAN
(a) The Director shall:
(1) Adopt and regularly update a plan for ensuring compliance with the
energy standards adopted under this subchapter in new and renovated
residential and commercial building space. In preparing the plan and any
updates to it, the Director shall:
(A) consider enforcement mechanisms for building energy codes that
have been adopted in other jurisdictions; and
(B) solicit comments and recommendations from one or more
mortgage lenders; builders; building designers; building scientists; architects;
civil, mechanical, and electrical engineers; utility representatives;
environmental organizations; consumer advocates; energy efficiency experts;
the Attorney General; and other persons who are potentially affected or have
relevant expertise.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 26 of 35
(2) Coordinate with the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Office of
Professional Regulation, the Department of Public Service, and any private
energy organizations, as the Director deems appropriate, to implement
trainings and services in support of building energy code certification and
building science education.
(b) The Director may:
(1) Establish a system for measuring the rate of compliance each year
with the energy standards adopted under this subchapter. If the Director
establishes such a system, the Director shall annually measure the rate of
compliance and publish that information on the website of the Division of Fire
and Building Safety.
(2) Adopt administrative rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement this subchapter.
§ 2776. PRIORITY HOUSING PROJECTS; STRETCH CODE
A priority housing project as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001 shall meet or
exceed the stretch codes established by the Director under this subchapter.
Sec. 4. 26 V.S.A. § 5509 is amended to read:
§ 5509. REQUIREMENTS OF REGISTRANTS
* * *
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 27 of 35
(b) Writing.
(1) A person registered under this chapter shall execute a written
contract prior to receiving a deposit or commencing residential construction
work if the estimated value of the labor and materials exceeds $10,000.00.
* * *
(4) Any contract for the residential construction services of a person
registered under this chapter shall provide that the residential contractor is
required to comply with 20 V.S.A. § 2772 (residential building energy
standards) and 20 V.S.A. § 2774 (commercial building energy standards).
* * *
Sec. 5. RESIDENTIAL BUILDING CONTRACTOR CONTRACT
TEMPLATES
The Office of Professional Regulation shall update any contract template
the Office furnishes for residential building contracting to provide that the
residential contractor is required to comply with 20 V.S.A. § 2772 (residential
building energy standards) and 20 V.S.A. § 2774 (commercial building energy
standards).
Sec. 6. RESIDENTIAL BUILDING CONTRACTOR; ENERGY
STANDARDS CERTIFICATION; TRADE SERVICES
(a) For each trade service compiled pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, the Office of Professional Regulation shall develop a certification as
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 28 of 35
that term is defined in 26 V.S.A. § 3101a recognizing proficiency in State
building energy standards under 20 V.S.A. § 2772 (residential building energy
standards) and 20 V.S.A. § 2774 (commercial building energy standards). If
the Office determines that the qualifications attested to by the certification
developed for a trade service are substantially similar to those required for the
performance of another trade service in compliance with State building energy
standards, the Office may employ the certification for each such trade service.
(b) The Office shall compile a list of trade services offered as residential
construction work by persons registered under 26 V.S.A. chapter 106.
Sec. 7. PERMIT SYSTEM REDESIGN; ENERGY CODES
The Division of Fire Safety shall include in its permit data system redesign,
currently in process, data fields for salient building energy code data, such as
certificate tracking number, date filed, by whom, conditioned square footage,
an industry-standard measure of airtightness, and energy use intensity or
similar metric.
Sec. 8. RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL BUILDING ENERGY
STANDARDS; TRANSITION
The Residential Building Energy Standards adopted pursuant to 30 V.S.A.
§ 51 and the Commercial Building Energy Standards adopted pursuant to
30 V.S.A. § 53 that are in effect on December 30, 2029, shall, on December
31, 2029, become the Residential Building Energy Standards and the
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 29 of 35
Commercial Building Energy Standards of the Division of Fire and Building
Safety until they are amended or repealed.
Sec. 9. INTEGRATION OF BUILDING AND ENERGY CODES; TASK
FORCE; REPORTS
(a) Creation. There is created the Building and Energy Codes Integration
Task Force to ensure that the Division of Fire Safety, upon assuming
jurisdiction over the Residential Building Energy Standards (RBES) and the
Commercial Building Energy Standards (CBES), shall be able to administer
Vermont’s building codes and energy standards in an integrated and
streamlined manner.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Director of Fire Safety or designee;
(2) the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation or designee;
(3) the Commissioner of Public Service or designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Labor or designee;
(5) the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee;
(6) the Managing Director of Efficiency Vermont or designee;
(7) the Executive Director of the American Institute of Architects,
Vermont chapter, or designee;
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 30 of 35
(8) the President of the Associated General Contractors of Vermont or
designee;
(9) the President of the Vermont Builders and Remodelers Association
or designee;
(10) the President of the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating,
and Air Conditioning Engineers, Champlain Valley Chapter, or designee; and
(11) the President of the ICC Building Safety Association of Vermont or
designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall advise the Division of Fire
Safety and develop proposed measures to ensure that the Division of Fire
Safety, upon assuming jurisdiction over the RBES and CBES, shall be able to
administer Vermont’s building codes and energy standards in an integrated and
streamlined manner, including the following:
(1) develop a plan, schedule, and budget for the Division of Fire Safety
to establish the administrative framework necessary to assume jurisdiction over
the RBES and CBES on or before December 31, 2029, which shall:
(A) identify specific steps that must be taken for the Division to
assume jurisdiction over the RBES and CBES;
(B) include a plan and schedule for hiring and training staff needed to
administer the RBES and CBES;
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 31 of 35
(C) identify information technology needs and a timeline for
acquisition; and
(D) provide a detailed estimate of related costs for each State fiscal
year;
(2) recommend potential revenue sources to support both the process of
transitioning the administration of the RBES and CBES to the Division of Fire
Safety and the ongoing administration of the RBES and CBES following the
transition;
(3) recommend the membership of a permanent advisory board to assist
the Division of Fire Safety with:
(A) carrying out its duties with respect to the RBES and CBES;
(B) determining a schedule and process for regularly updating the
RBES and CBES;
(C) identifying strategies for integrated and streamlined enforcement
of the RBES and CBES in conjunction with Vermont’s other building codes;
and
(D) identifying any legislative action necessary to facilitate the
integrated and streamlined enforcement of the RBES and CBES in conjunction
with Vermont’s other building codes; and
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 32 of 35
(4) examine:
(A) the overlapping jurisdiction of the Division of Fire Safety and the
Office of Professional Regulation with respect to contractors and individuals
working in the construction trades; and
(B) potential opportunities to simplify and streamline the regulation
of contractors and individuals working in the construction trades.
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of Department of Public Safety and the Division of Fire
Safety.
(e) Report. Annually, on or before November 1, the Task Force shall
submit a written report to the House Committees on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure and on Housing and General Affairs and to the Senate
Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on
Natural Resources and Energy with a summary of its work during the
preceding year and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Director of Fire Safety shall call the first meeting of the Task
Force to occur on or before November 1, 2026.
(2) The Task Force shall meet at least once per calendar quarter.
(3) The Task Force shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 33 of 35
(4) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(5) The Task Force shall cease to exist on January 1, 2030.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Task Force who
are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings shall be entitled
to per diem compensation as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more
than four meetings per year. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the Division of Fire Safety.
Sec. 10. CONFORMING REVISIONS
When preparing the Vermont Statutes Annotated for publication, the Office
of Legislative Counsel shall make the following revisions throughout the
statutes as needed for consistency with Secs. 1, 2, and 3 of this act, provided
the revisions have no other effect on the meaning of the affected statutes:
(1) replace “Division of Fire Safety” with “Division of Fire and
Building Safety”;
(2) replace “30 V.S.A. § 51” with “20 V.S.A. § 2772”;
(3) replace “30 V.S.A. § 53” with “20 V.S.A. § 2774”; and
(4) revisions that are substantially similar to those described in
subdivisions (1)–(3) of this section.
* * * Adoption of Residential Building Code * * *
Sec. 11. ADOPTION OF RESIDENTIAL BUILDING CODE;
APPROPRIATION; POSITION
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 34 of 35
(a) The Division of Fire Safety shall adopt a residential building code for
public buildings that contain residential units to take effect on or before
December 31, 2027. The residential building code shall be based on the
International Residential Code. The Director of Fire Safety shall, on or before
April 1, 2027, file with the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to 3
V.S.A. § 838 proposed rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this
subsection.
(b)(1) The establishment of one permanent, exempt full-time residential
building code administrator in the Division of Fire Safety is authorized for
fiscal year 2027.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the residential building
code administrator position authorized pursuant to this subsection shall be
filled in time to commence work on or before January 1, 2027.
(c) The amount of $50,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Division of Fire Safety in fiscal year 2027 for salary and benefits of the
residential building code administrator authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 4–7 (requirements and certifications related to
RBES and CBES) shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386266 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.717
2026 Page 35 of 35
(b) Secs. 1–3 (transfer of jurisdiction over RBES and CBES to Division of
Fire and Building Safety), 8 (transition of RBES and CBES), and 10
(conforming revisions) shall take effect on December 31, 2029.
(c) Sec. 9 (Building and Energy Codes Integration Task Force) and Sec. 11
(adoption of residential building code) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386266 v.3